Utah statutes.
26-2-19.   Rules of department for transmittal of certificates and keeping of records by local registrar.

Each local registrar shall transmit all records registered by him to the department in accordance with department rules. The manner of keeping local copies of vital records and the uses  of them shall be prescribed by department rules.

